Maine, session 132, LD1656.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA Pt. 32 is enacted to read:
PART 32
IMMIGRATION INFORMATION SHARING
CHAPTER 641
IMMIGRATION STATUS
§26001. Short title
This chapter may be known and cited as "the Public Safety and Protection Act."
§26002. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Federal immigration agency. "Federal immigration agency" means the United
States Department of Justice, the United States Department of Homeland Security or any
division within either of those departments, including but not limited to United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement, United States Customs and Border Protection or
any successor agency or any other federal agency charged with the enforcement or
administration of immigration or border control.
2. Government entity. "Government entity" means a state government entity, state
government entity official, local government entity, local government entity official, law
enforcement agency or law enforcement agency official.
3. Immigration detainer. "Immigration detainer" means a facially sufficient written
or electronic request issued by a federal immigration agency using that agency's official
form to request that another law enforcement agency detain a person based on probable
cause to believe that the person to be detained is a removable alien under federal
immigration law, including detainers issued pursuant to 8 United States Code, Sections
1226 to 1232 and 8 United States Code, Section 1357. For the purposes of this subsection,
an immigration detainer is facially sufficient if:
A. The federal immigration agency's official form is complete and indicates on its face
that the federal immigration agency has probable cause to believe that the person to be
detained is a removable alien under federal immigration law; or
B. The federal immigration agency's official form is incomplete and fails to indicate
on its face that the federal immigration agency has probable cause to believe that the
person to be detained is a removable alien under federal immigration law, but is
supported by an affidavit, order or other official documentation, such as a Form I-200
Warrant for Arrest of Alien or a Form I-205 Warrant of Removal and Deportation, or
a successor warrant or other warrant authorized by federal law, that indicates that the
federal immigration agency has probable cause to believe that the person to be detained
is a removable alien under federal immigration law.
Page 1 - 132LR0588(01)

4. Immigration law. "Immigration law" means the laws of this State or federal law
relating to immigrants or immigration, including but not limited to the federal Immigration
and Nationality Act.
5. Inmate. "Inmate" means a person in the custody of a law enforcement agency.
6. Law enforcement agency. "Law enforcement agency" means an agency in the
State charged with enforcement of state, county, municipal or federal laws or with
managing custody of detained persons in the State and includes but is not limited to
municipal police departments; sheriffs' departments; the State Police; if a university or
college has an organized police department, the campus police; and the Department of
Public Safety.
7. Law enforcement agency official. "Law enforcement agency official" means a
person having official duties as a representative, agent or employee of a law enforcement
agency.
8. Local government entity. "Local government entity" means a county, municipality
or other political subdivision of the State.
9. Local government entity official. "Local government entity official" means a
person having official duties as a representative, agent or employee of a local government
entity.
10. State government entity. "State government entity" means a department, agency,
bureau, commission, council or other entity established under the laws of the State.
11. State government entity official. "State government entity official" means a
person having official duties as a representative, agent or employee of a state government
entity.
§26003. Prohibited practices regarding immigration enforcement
A state government entity, local government entity or law enforcement agency may not
adopt or maintain a law, ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, policy, directive, order,
practice or procedure, formal or informal, written or unwritten, that prohibits or materially
restricts the state government entity, local government entity or law enforcement agency
from complying with or assisting in the enforcement of immigration law, including, but not
limited to, prohibiting or materially restricting the state government entity, local
government entity or law enforcement agency from prohibiting or otherwise materially
restricting any state government entity, local government entity or law enforcement agency
from assisting in the enforcement of immigration law. This section applies to prohibitions
or restrictions on:
1. Inquiries into status. Inquiries into the immigration status of any person;
2. Information relating to status. Transmitting, requesting or receiving information
relating to immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any person to or from any federal
immigration agency;
3. Maintaining information. Maintaining, archiving or otherwise storing for
subsequent use information relating to a person's immigration status;
Page 2 - 132LR0588(01)

4. Exchanging information. Exchanging information relating to immigration status
with another local government entity or state government entity or a federal immigration
agency;
5. Complying with detainer. Complying with an immigration detainer, including,
but not limited to, refusing to cooperate or comply with a lawfully issued immigration
detainer in the absence of a warrant or other order directing compliance with or
enforcement of such an immigration detainer;
6. Complying with request to notify. Complying with a request from a federal
immigration agency to notify the agency before the release of an inmate;
7. Providing incarceration status. Providing a federal immigration agency with an
inmate's incarceration status or release date;
8. Assisting federal immigration agency. Assisting or cooperating with a federal
immigration agency, including by providing enforcement assistance;
9. Participating in program. Participating in any program or agreement authorized
under the federal Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 United States Code, Section 1357(g);
and
10. Permitting officer to enter jail. Permitting a federal immigration officer to enter
and conduct enforcement activities at a municipal jail, county jail, state prison or other
correctional facility involving or related to the enforcement of federal immigration laws.
§26004. Complaint process; appeals
1. Resident complaints and Legislator requests submitted to Attorney General.
A resident of the State may submit a complaint to the Attorney General asserting a violation
of section 26003 by a government entity. The complaint must be in writing and in a form
and manner as prescribed by the Attorney General. A member of the Legislature may
request that the Attorney General investigate and issue an opinion as to whether a
government entity has violated section 26003.
2. Attorney General investigation. After receiving a complaint or request under
subsection 1, the Attorney General shall investigate and determine whether a violation of
section 26003 has occurred. If after the investigation the Attorney General determines that
a violation of section 26003 has occurred, the Attorney General shall issue an opinion that
a violation has occurred. The Attorney General shall make the opinion available to the
public.
3. Review of Attorney General findings. If the Attorney General issues an opinion
pursuant to subsection 2 that a government entity has violated section 26003, the
government entity has 30 days from the date the opinion was issued to contest the finding
in Superior Court.
A. If the Superior Court affirms the Attorney General's findings, the court shall
immediately enjoin the policy or practice in violation of section 26003. A government
entity that fails to comply with an injunction is subject to a fine of $500 for each day
the policy or practice of the government entity remains in effect.
B. If the Superior Court overturns the Attorney General's findings, the Attorney
General shall immediately certify that the government entity is in compliance with
section 26003.
Page 3 - 132LR0588(01)

§26005. Duty to report
A state government entity official, local government entity official, law enforcement
agency official or person holding public office shall report a violation of section 26003 by
submitting a complaint to the Attorney General pursuant to section 26004, subsection 1. A
person who reports a violation under this section is protected under the federal
Whistleblower Protection Act of 1989.
§26006. Implementation
This chapter must be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws regulating
immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons and respecting the privileges and
immunities of citizens of the United States. In complying with the requirements of this
chapter, a government entity may not consider a person's race, color or national origin,
except to the extent permitted by the United States Constitution and the Constitution of
Maine.